Tennessee, session 114, SB1132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-10-1403, is amended by deleting
subsection (e) and substituting:
(e)
(1) A parent of a participating student:
(A) Shall ensure that the participating student is annually
administered all Tennessee comprehensive assessment program (TCAP)
tests, or successor tests authorized by the state board of education, that
are administered to a public school student in the same grade or same
course subject as the participating student;
(B) In grade eleven (11) shall ensure that the student is
administered the examination that is administered to public school
students in grade (11) pursuant to § 49-6-6001(b)(1); and
(C) In any of the grades kindergarten through three (K-3) shall
ensure that the participating student is annually administered each of the
three (3) Tennessee universal reading screeners, or universal reading
screeners approved by the state board of education, as described in § 49-
1-905(c) during each of the three (3) administration windows established
by the department of education pursuant to § 49-1-905(c)(1).
SB1132
002043
- 1 -

(2) A participating student's results on the tests administered pursuant to
this subsection (e) must be reported to the parent of the student.
(3) Students with disabilities who would have participated in the alternate
assessments, as determined on the student's IEP, are exempt from the
requirements in this subsection (e).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2606(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) As a condition of participating in the program:
(A) Participating students must be annually administered the Tennessee
comprehensive assessment program (TCAP) tests, or successor tests authorized
by the state board of education, that are administered to a public school student
in the same grade or same course subject as the participating student;
(B) Participating students in grade eleven (11) must be administered the
examination that is administered to public schools students in grade eleven (11)
pursuant to § 49-6-6001(b)(1); and
(C) Participating students in kindergarten through grade three (K-3) must
annually be administered each of the three (3) Tennessee universal reading
screeners, or universal reading screeners approved by the state board of
education, as described in § 49-1-905(c) during each of the three (3)
administration windows established by the department of education pursuant to §
49-1-905(c)(1).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002043